Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 802.250 is amended to read:
802.250. (1) An eligible public employee may request that any driver or vehicle record kept  by
the Department of Transportation that contains or  is required to contain the eligible employee’s
residence address contain instead the address of the public agency  employing the eligible
employee. A request under this section shall:
(a) Be in a form specified by the department that provides  for verification of the eligible
employee’s employment.
(b) Contain verification by  the employing public agency of the eligible employee’s employment
with the public agency.
(2) Upon receipt of a request and verification under subsection (1) of this section, the depart-
ment shall remove the eligible employee’s residence address from its records, if necessary, and  sub-
stitute therefor the address of the public agency employing the  eligible employee. The department
shall indicate on the records that the address shown is an employment  address. While the request
is in effect, the eligible employee may enter the address of  the public agency employing the eligible
employee on any driver or vehicle form issued by the department that requires an address.
(3) A public agency that verifies an eligible employee’s employment under subsection (1) of this
section shall notify the  department within 30 days if the eligible employee ceases to be employed
by the public agency. The eligible employee shall notify the  department of a change of address as
provided in ORS 803.220 or 807.560.
(4) If an eligible employee is killed in the line  of duty, a person who is a household member of
the eligible employee may request that any  driver or vehicle record kept by the department that
contains or is required to contain the household member’s residence  address continue to contain the
address of the public agency that  employed the eligible employee for up to four years after the date
of the death of the eligible employee. On or before the  date on which the four-year period ends, the
household member shall notify the department of a change of address as provided in ORS  803.220
or 807.560. A request under this subsection shall be in a form specified by the department.
(5) As used in this section, “eligible employee” means:
(a) A member of the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision.
(b) The Director of the Department of Corrections and an employee of an institution  defined in
ORS 421.005 as Department of Corrections institutions, whose duties, as assigned by the super-
Enrolled House Bill 2922 (HB 2922-A) Page 1
intendent, include the custody of persons committed to the  custody of or transferred to the institu-
tion.
(c) A parole and probation officer employed by the Department of Corrections and  an employee
of the Department of Corrections Release Center whose duties,  as assigned by the Chief of the Re-
lease Center, include the custody of persons committed to the custody of or transferred to the Re-
lease Center.
(d) A police officer appointed under ORS 276.021 or 276.023.
(e) An employee of the State Department of Agriculture who is classified as a brand inspector
by the Director of Agriculture.
(f) An investigator of the Criminal Justice Division of the Department of Justice.
(g) A corrections officer as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(h) A federal officer.  As used in this paragraph, “federal officer” means a special agent or law
enforcement officer employed by:
(A) The Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(B) The United States Secret Service;
(C) The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services;
(D) The United States Marshals Service;
(E) The Drug Enforcement Administration;
(F) The United States Postal Service;
(G) The United States Customs and Border Protection;
(H) The United States General Services Administration;
(I) The United States Department of Agriculture;
(J) The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives;
(K) The Internal Revenue Service;
(L) The United States Department of the Interior; or
(M) Any federal agency if the person is empowered to effect an arrest with or without warrant
for violations of the  United States Code and is authorized to carry firearms in the performance of
duty.
(i) An employee of the  Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority whose
duties include personal contact with clients or patients of the department or the authority.
(j) Any judge of a court of this state.
(k) An employee  of the Oregon Youth Authority or of a county juvenile department whose duties
include personal contact with persons committed to the legal or  physical custody of the authority
or of the county juvenile department.
(L) A district attorney, as defined in ORS 131.005, or deputy district attorney.
(m) An employee who provides educational services  to persons who are clients or patients of the
Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health Authority, who are under the  jurisdiction of
the Psychiatric Security Review Board or who are  under the custody or supervision of the Depart-
ment of Corrections, the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison  Supervision, a community cor-
rections agency, the Oregon Youth Authority or a juvenile department. As used in  this paragraph,
“employee who provides educational services”  means a person who provides instruction, or services
related to the instruction, of a subject usually taught in an elementary school, a secondary  school
or a community college or who  provides special education and related services in other than a
school setting and who works for:
(A) An education service district or a community college district; or
(B) A state officer, board, commission, bureau,  department or division in the executive branch
of state government that provides educational services.
(n) An employee of the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission who is:
(A) A regulatory specialist; or
(B) A regulatory manager.
(o) A police officer as defined in ORS 801.395.
Enrolled House Bill 2922 (HB 2922-A) Page 2
(p) An employee whose duties include personal contact with criminal offenders and who  is em-
ployed by a law enforcement unit, as defined in ORS 181A.355.
(q) A civil code enforcement officer, as defined in ORS 192.345.
(r) An assistant attorney general whose duties  include the representation of the Department of
Human Services in child welfare matters.
(s) An employee of the Department of Justice who staffs the hate  crimes hotline described in
ORS 147.380.
(t) An employee of  the State Parks and Recreation Department whose job classification
is a park manager or a park ranger.
Passed by House March 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 30, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2922 (HB 2922-A) Page 3